Utah statutes.
10-2-428.   Neither annexation nor boundary adjustment has an effect on the boundaries of most local districts or special service districts.

Except as provided in Section 17B-1-416 and Subsection 17B-1-502(2), the annexation of an unincorporated area by a municipality or the adjustment of a boundary shared by municipalities does not affect the boundaries of a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.

